Washington statutes.
RCW 15.62.210

Nonliability of state—Salaries, expenses, and liabilities.

The state shall not be liable for the acts or on the contracts of the commission, nor shall any member or employee of the commission be liable on its contracts.

All salaries, expenses, and liabilities incurred by persons employed or contracting under this chapter for the commission shall be limited to, and payable only from, the funds collected hereunder.

[ 1989 c 5 s 21.]